North Dakota, session 69, HB1555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Statement of ownership - Secretary of state to forward certain filings - Penalty.
1. An organization that is required to register with the secretary of state also shall file a
statement with the secretary of state certifying whether the organization is a foreign
organization of concern. An organization required to file a statement under this section
shall file the statement simultaneously with the articles of incorporation, articles of
organization, certificate of authority, or other organization registration document
required by the secretary of state.
2. If the secretary of state discovers any filing in which the statement of ownership was
falsified and the filing violates section 47 - 01 - 09 or chapter 47 - 10.1, the secretary o f
state shall forward the filing to the attorney general.
3. If the attorney general determines a violation occurred, the attorney general may
prosecute the action in the district court of the county in which the registered agent of
the organization is located or in Burleigh County.
4. An organization that willfully violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
5. As used in this section:
Page No. 1 25.1257.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. "Foreign country of concern" means a regime or a government identified as a
foreign adversary under title 15, Code of Federal Regulations, part 791.4(a) or a
person identified on the office of foreign assets control sanctions list.
b. "Foreign organization of concern" means an organization domiciled or formed
within a foreign country of concern.
Page No. 2 25.1257.02000